hu: Vonóhorog típusa: Rögzített; Nincs; Kiemelkedő; Kivehető; Visszahúzható; Egyéb
th: แบบขอเกี่ยวลากจูง: แบบตายตัว; ไม่มี; แบบป๊อปอัป; แบบถอดได้; แบบพับเก็บได้; อื่นๆ
zh-CN: 牵引钩类型: 固定式; 无; 弹出式; 可拆卸式; 可伸缩式; 其他
sl-SI: Vrsta vlečne kljuke: Fiksen; Brez; Dvižen; Odstranljiv; Zložljiv; Drugo
zh-TW: 拖曳鉤類型: 固定式; 無; 彈出式; 可拆卸式; 可伸縮式; 其他
ru: Тип буксировочного крюка: Фиксированный; Нет; Выдвижной; Съёмный; Убирающийся; Другое
pt-BR: Gancho de reboque tipo: Fixo; Nenhum; Pop-up; Removível; Retrátil; Outros
nb: Type slepekrok: Fast; Ingen; Pop-up; Avtakbar; Inntrekkbar; Annet
da: Type af trækkrog: Fast; Ingen; Pop-op; Aftagelig; Indtrækkelig; Andet
sk-SK: Typ ťažného háku: Pevný; Žiadny; Výsuvný; Odnímateľný; Zaťahovací; Iné
pl: Typ haczyka do ciągnięcia: Stały; Brak; Wysuwany (pop-up); Zdejmowany; Chowany; Inny
tr: Çeki kancası tipi: Sabit; Yok; Açılır (Pop-up); Çıkarılabilir; Geri çekilebilir; Diğer
lt-LT: Vilkimo kablio tipas: Fiksuotas; Nėra; Iššokantis; Nuimamas; Sustumiamas; Kita
hr-HR: Vrsta vučne kuke: Fiksna; Ništa; Skočna (pop-up); Uklonjiva; Na uvlačenje; Ostalo
pt-PT: Tipo de gancho de reboque: Fixo; Nenhum; Pop-up; Amovível; Retrátil; Outro
fr: Type de crochet de traction: Fixe; Aucun; Escamotable; Amovible; Rétractable; Autre
vi: Loại móc kéo: Cố định; Không có; Dạng bật; Có thể tháo rời; Có thể thụt vào; Khác
es: Tipo de gancho de remolque: Fijo; Ninguno; Emergente; Extraíble; Retráctil; Otro
it: Tipo di gancio di traino: Fisso; Nessuno; A scomparsa; Rimovibile; Retrattile; Altro
ja: 牽引フックタイプ: 固定式; なし; ポップアップ; 取り外し可能; 格納式; その他
en: Tow hook type: Fixed; None; Pop-up; Removable; Retractable; Other
sv: Typ av dragkrok: Fast; Ingen; Pop-up; Avtagbar; Infällbar; Övrigt
fi: Vetokoukun tyyppi: Kiinteä; Ei mitään; Esiin nouseva; Irrotettava; Sisäänvedettävä; Muu
ko: 견인 고리 유형: 고정식; 없음; 팝업식; 탈착식; 수납식; 기타
cs: Typ tažného háku: Pevné; Žádné; Vyskakovací; Odnímatelné; Zatahovací; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип теглителна кука: Фиксирана; Без; Изскачаща; Сваляема; Прибираща се; Друго
ro-RO: Tipul cârligului de remorcare: Fix; Fără; Pop-up; Detașabil; Retractabil; Altele
nl: Trekhaak type: Vast; Geen; Pop-up; Verwijderbaar; Intrekbaar; Overige
de: Typ des Abschlepphakens: Fest; Keine; Pop-up; Abnehmbar; Einziehbar; Sonstige
el: Τύπος γάντζου ρυμούλκησης: Σταθερός; Κανένα; Αναδυόμενος; Αφαιρούμενος; Ανασυρόμενος; Άλλο